California statutes. Education Code
(A) Tutoring or other one-on-one or small group learning supports provided by certificated or classified staff.

(B) Learning recovery programs and materials
 designed to accelerate pupil academic proficiency, English language proficiency, or both.

(C) Educator training, for both certificated and classified staff, in accelerated learning strategies and effectively addressing learning gaps, including training in facilitating quality and engaging learning opportunities for all pupils.

(3) Integrated pupil supports to address other barriers to learning, such as the provision of health, counseling, or mental health services, access to school meal programs, before and after school programs, or programs to address pupil trauma and social-emotional learning, or referrals for support for family or pupil needs.

(4) Community learning hubs that provide pupils with access to technology, high-speed internet, and other academic supports.

(5) Supports for credit deficient pupils to complete graduation or grade promotion requirements and to increase or improve pupils’ college eligibility.

(6) Additional academic services for pupils, such as diagnostic, progress monitoring, and benchmark assessments of pupil learning.

(7) Training for school staff on strategies, including trauma-informed practices, to engage pupils and families in addressing pupils’ social-emotional health needs and academic needs.

(c) (1) (A) Of the funds apportioned under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 43521, a local educational agency shall use at least 10 percent of its apportionment to hire paraprofessionals to provide supplemental instruction and support through the
 duration of this program, with a priority for full-time paraprofessionals. Supplemental instruction and support shall be prioritized for English learners and pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs. It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency prioritize rehiring paraprofessionals subject to layoff or release after the expiration of the protections included for classified employees in Section 94 of Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020, and further increasing the number of paraprofessional staff to meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) A local educational agency shall use the General Fund funds apportioned to it pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43521 to fulfill the requirements of subparagraph (A).

(2) The department shall identify for each local educational agency the amount of funding received pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 43521 that is required to be expended pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Funds expended pursuant to this subdivision shall count towards meeting the minimum use of funds requirement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “paraprofessional” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 45330.

(d) (1) Of the funds apportioned under subdivision (b) of Section 43521, a local educational agency shall use at least 85 percent of its apportionment for expenditures related to providing in-person services allowable pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) A local educational agency that has forfeited funding pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 43521 may expend up to 10 percent of funding received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43521 in the 2020–21 school year to support school reopening for costs consistent with allowable uses under subdivision (f). Funds expended pursuant to this paragraph shall be considered “expenditures related to providing in-person services allowable pursuant to subdivision (b)” for purposes of paragraph (1).

(3) Of the funds apportioned under subdivision (b) of Section 43521, a local educational agency may expend up to 15 percent to increase or improve services for pupils participating in distance learning or to support activities intended to prepare a local educational agency for in-person instruction, before in-person instructional services are offered.

(e) (1) On or before June 1, 2021, the governing board or body of a local educational
 agency that receives funds under subdivision (b) of Section 43521 shall adopt at a public meeting a plan describing how the apportioned funds will be used in accordance with this section. Within 5 days of adoption, a school district shall submit the plan to its county office of education, a charter school shall submit its plan to its chartering authority, and a county office of education or a school district in a single-district county shall submit its plan to the department. A county office of education or a chartering authority shall send received plans to the Superintendent upon request. Local educational agencies shall provide an opportunity for parents and schoolsite staff to be involved in the development of the plan.

(2) (A) Within 21 days of March 5, 2021, the Superintendent, with the concurrence of the executive director of the state board, shall develop and post on the department’s internet website a template for
 the plan required pursuant to paragraph (1). The template shall include all of the following:

(i) A description of the local educational agency’s plan for assessing the needs of its pupils.

(ii) A description of the local educational agency’s plan for informing the parents and guardians of all of its pupils requiring learning recovery supports of the availability of these opportunities, including in parents’ and guardians’ primary languages pursuant to Section 48985.

(iii) A description of how the local educational agency involved parents and schoolsite staff, including classified and certificated staff, in the development of the plan.

(iv) A description of how the local educational agency has planned supplemental instruction and support pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(v) The local educational agency’s expenditure plan for funds received under subdivision (b) of Section 43521 and how they will be coordinated with funds received from the federal Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief Fund provided through the federal Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2021 (Public Law 116-260) that were received by the local educational agency. The expenditure plan shall include an indication of how much of the apportioned funds the local educational agency will allocate and expend for each allowable purpose pursuant to this section, and shall reflect both estimated and actual expenditures. Actual expenditures shall be reported when they are available.

(B) The development of the template for the plan pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not be subject to the requirements of the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(3) This subdivision does not preclude a local educational agency from receiving or expending funds apportioned under subdivision (b) of Section 43521 before the adoption of its plan pursuant to paragraph (1).

(f) Funds apportioned under subdivision (c) of Section 43521 may be used for any purpose consistent with providing in-person instruction for any pupil participating in in-person instruction, including, but not limited to, COVID-19 testing, cleaning and disinfection, personal protective equipment, ventilation and other schoolsite upgrades necessary for health and safety, salaries for certificated or classified employees providing in-person instruction or services, and social and mental health support services provided in conjunction with
 in-person instruction.

(g) A local educational agency and state special school apportioned funds under Section 43521 shall ensure all services delivered to pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs are delivered in accordance with an applicable individualized education program.

(h) Local educational agencies are encouraged to engage, plan, and collaborate on program operation with community partners and expanded learning programs, and leverage existing behavioral health partnerships and Medi-Cal billing options, in the design and implementation of services provided under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 13.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43523.

(a) For 2021–22 fiscal year audits, the Controller shall include instructions in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1 that include procedures for determining both of the following for local educational agencies that receive apportionments under Section 43521:

(1) Compliance with clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 43521.

(2) Compliance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 43522.

(b) (1) For a local educational agency with audit findings of noncompliance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 43522, the Superintendent shall withhold from the local
 educational agency’s principal apportionment an amount equal to the amount of expenditures from state funds that are noncompliant pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 43522.

(2) For a local educational agency with audit findings of noncompliance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 43522, the Superintendent shall withhold from the local educational agency’s principal apportionment an amount equal to the amount of expenditures from state funds that are noncompliant pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 43522.

(c) Local educational agencies receiving apportionments under Section 43521 shall report final expenditures of those apportioned funds to the department in accordance with paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. A local educational agency that does not submit an expenditure report shall forfeit all respective funds apportioned pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section
 43521. The Superintendent shall initiate collection proceedings for unexpended funds or forfeited amounts, and may withhold the unexpended or forfeited amounts from the local educational agency’s principal apportionment. Final expenditures shall be reported to the department as follows:

(1) On or before January 31, 2025, final expenditures of state funds received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43521.

(2) On or before December 1, 2024, final expenditures of state funds received pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 43521.

(3) On or before June 30, 2024, final expenditures of federal funds received pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 43521, based on the allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43521.

(4) On or before July 31, 2026, final expenditures of federal funds received pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 43521, based on the allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43521.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 24.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43524.

The requirements of this chapter shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 86)   Effective March 5, 2021.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43525.

This part shall become inoperative on June 30, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 25.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 24.6, commencing with Section 43520.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 25. EMPLOYEES [44000. - 45500.]



  CHAPTER 1. Employees [44000. - 44114.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [44000. - 44020.]

44000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in Sections 44000 to 44012, inclusive, shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44000.5.

An “adverse action” means the denial of an application for a credential, a private admonition, or public reproval of a credential holder, or the suspension or revocation of a credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.

“Education position” or “position requiring certification qualifications” includes every type of service for which certification qualifications are established by or pursuant to Sections 44000 to 44012, inclusive, Section 44065, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200) of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.1.

“Commission” means the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 937, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.2.

“Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 937, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44002.

A “credential” includes a credential, certificate, life document, life diploma, permit, certificate of clearance, or waiver issued by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44003.

A “life diploma” is a document issued on the basis of a credential upon completion by the applicant of specified requirements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44004.

The word “certificate” used as a noun refers to the document issued by a county board of education to license the holder to perform the service specified in the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44005.

The word “certificate” used as a verb refers to the act of licensing individuals for employment in educational positions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44006.

The term “certificated person” refers to a person who holds one or more documents such as a certificate, a credential, or a life diploma, which singly or in combination license the holder to engage in the school service designated in the document or documents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44007.

The term “certification document” as used in this code includes only certificates, credentials and life diplomas.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44008.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section, a termination of probation and dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code shall not, for the purpose of this division, have any effect.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no person shall be denied a hearing solely on the basis that he has been convicted of a crime if he has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Section 4852.01 and following of the Penal Code, and if his probation has been terminated and the information or accusation has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44009.

(a) A plea or verdict of guilty or finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of Sections 44242.5, 44345, 44346, 44346.1, 44424, and 44425, irrespective of a subsequent order for probation suspending the imposition of a sentence or an order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information.

(b) The record of a narcotics offense, as defined in Section 44011, shall be sufficient proof of conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude for the purposes of Sections 44907 and 44923, and Sections 44932 to 44947, inclusive, relating to the dismissal of permanent employees.

(c) A plea or verdict of guilty, or finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of Sections 44836 and 45123, irrespective of a subsequent order for probation suspending the imposition of a sentence or an order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information. The record of conviction shall be sufficient proof of conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude for the purposes of Section 44907 and Sections 44932 to 44947, inclusive, relating to the dismissal of permanent employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44010.

“Sex offense,” as used in Sections 44020, 44237, 44346, 44425, 44436, 44836, and 45123, means any one or more of the offenses listed below:

(a) An offense defined in Section 220, 261, 261.5, 288.2, 288.3, 288.4, subdivision (c) of Section 290, Section 311.2, 313.1, 647b, subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 647, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 647.6, of the Penal Code.

(b) An offense defined in former subdivision (5) of former Section 647 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 560 of the Statutes of 1961, or any offense defined in former subdivision (2) of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961, if the offense defined in those sections was committed before September
 15, 1961, to the same extent that an offense committed before that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section before September 15, 1961.

(c) An offense defined in Section 314 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.

(d) An offense defined in former subdivision (1) of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961 committed on or after September 7, 1955, and before September 15, 1961.

(e) An offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under Section 272 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.

(f) An offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under former Section 702 of the Welfare and Institutions Code repealed by Chapter 1616 of the Statutes of 1961, if that
 offense was committed before September 15, 1961, to the same extent that an offense committed before that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section before September 15, 1961.

(g) An offense defined in Section 286 or 288a of the Penal Code before the effective date of the amendment of either section enacted at the 1975–76 Regular Session of the Legislature committed before the effective date of the amendment.

(h) An attempt to commit any of the offenses specified in this section.

(i) An offense committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses specified in this section.

(j) A conviction for an offense
 resulting in the requirement to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(k) Commitment as a mentally disordered sex offender under former Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as repealed by Chapter 928 of the Statutes of 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 5.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44011.

“Controlled substance offense” as used in Sections 44346, 44425, 44436, 44836, and 45123 means any one or more of the following offenses:

(a) Any offense in Sections 11350 to 11355, inclusive, 11361, 11366, 11368, 11377 to 11382, inclusive, and 11550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any offense committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws of the United States which, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punished as one or more of the above-mentioned offenses.

(c) Any offense committed under former Sections 11500 to 11503, inclusive, 11557, 11715, and 11721 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Any attempt to commit any of the above-mentioned offenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44012.

Any record of conviction of any applicant for, or holder of, a certification document, shall, for the purposes of this division, be admissible in evidence in any civil action or administrative proceedings pertaining to the issuance, suspension or revocation of such certification document, any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44013.

(a) “Educator” means a certificated person holding a valid California teaching credential or a valid California services credential issued by the commission who is employed by a local education agency or by a special education local planning area and who is not employed as an independent contractor or consultant.

(b) The definition of educator as set forth in subdivision (a) does not apply to a person participating in a program enacted by statute prior to January 1, 2004.

(c) The definition of educator as set forth in subdivision (a) applies to a person participating in a program enacted by statute on or after January 1, 2004, only if the statute implementing the program expressly references this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44014.

(a) Whenever any employee of a school district or of the office of a county superintendent of schools is attacked, assaulted, or physically threatened by any pupil, it shall be the duty of the employee, and the duty of any person under whose direction or supervision the employee is employed in the public school system who has knowledge of the incident, to promptly report the incident to the appropriate law enforcement authorities of the county or city in which the incident occurred. Failure to make the report shall be an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) Compliance with school district governing board procedures relating to the reporting of, or facilitation of reporting of, the incidents specified in subdivision (a) shall not exempt a person under a duty to make the report prescribed by subdivision (a) from making the report.

(c) A member of the governing board of a school district, a county superintendent of schools, or an employee of any school district or the office of any county superintendent of schools, shall not directly or indirectly inhibit or impede the making of the report prescribed by subdivision (a) by a person under a duty to make the report. An act to inhibit or impede the making of a report shall be an infraction, and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) Neither the governing board of a school district, a member of the governing board, a county superintendent of schools, nor an employee of a school district or of the office of any county superintendent of schools shall impose any sanctions against a person under a duty to make the report prescribed by subdivision (a) for making the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

44015.

(a) The governing board of a school district may make awards to employees who do any of the following:

(1) Propose procedures or ideas that thereafter are adopted and effectuated, and that result in eliminating or reducing district expenditures or improving operations.

(2) Perform special acts or special services in the public interest.

(3) By their superior accomplishments, make exceptional contributions to the efficiency, economy, or other improvement in operations of the school district. 

(b) The governing board of a school district may make awards to pupils for excellence.

Before any awards are made pursuant to this section, the governing board shall adopt rules and regulations. The board may appoint one or more merit award committees made up of district officers, district employees, or private citizens to consider employee proposals, special acts, special services, or superior accomplishments and to act affirmatively or negatively thereon or to provide appropriate recommendations thereon to the board.

Any award granted under the provisions of this section that may be made by an awards committee under appropriate district rules, shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200), unless a larger award is expressly approved by the governing board.

When an awards program is established in a school district pursuant to this section, the governing board shall budget funds for this purpose but may authorize awards from funds under its control whether or not budgeted funds have been provided or the funds budgeted are exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

44015.1.

In observance of the importance of educational leadership at the school, school district, and county levels, the second full week in the month of October of each year shall be designated as “Week of the School Administrator.” Schools, school districts, and county superintendents of schools are encouraged to observe the week with public recognition of the contribution that school administrators make to successful pupil achievement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   (SB 1229)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44016.

Whenever any person is requested by a school district to travel to the headquarters of such district for the purpose of being interviewed and examined prior to possible employment, the district may reimburse such candidate for expenses necessarily incurred in traveling from his place of residence to the place of interview or examination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44017.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a school district may, from funds under its jurisdiction, pay the surviving spouse of any employee who is murdered while in the course of his employment the amount that the deceased would have received if he had lived to complete the time remaining in his contract with the district.

This section shall be applicable to the surviving spouse of any such employee who was murdered during or after the 1973–74 school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44018.

(a) In addition to the benefits provided pursuant to Sections 395.01 and 395.02 of the Military and Veterans Code, any employee of a school district who, as a member of the California National Guard or a United States Military Reserve organization, is called into active military duty, may receive, on approval of the governing board of the school district, the benefits provided for in subdivision (b).

(b) Any employee to which subdivision (a) applies, while on active duty, may receive from the school employer, for a period not to exceed 180 calendar days, as part of his or her compensation, all of the following:

(1) The difference between the amount of his or her military pay and allowances and the amount the employee would have received as an employee, including any merit raises that would otherwise have been granted during the time the individual was on active military duty.

(2) All benefits that he or she would have received had he or she not been called to active military duty unless the benefits are prohibited or limited by vendor contracts.

(c) The credential of a certificated employee may not become invalid for failure to renew while the employee, as a member of the California National Guard or a United States Military Reserve organization, is on active military duty. A certificated employee shall have a period of 120 days after the end of his or her active military duty to renew the credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44020.

Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level shall notify, in writing, the parents or guardians who reside with each pupil of that school whenever that school hires an employee who, in the course of his or her employment, will come in contact with minor pupils and who has been convicted of a sex offense, as defined in Section 44010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who conveys or receives information in good-faith conformity with this section is exempt from prosecution under Section 11142 or 11143 of the Penal Code for that conveying or receiving of information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1074, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rights and Duties [44030. - 44052.]

44030.

Any principal, teacher, employee, or school officer of any elementary or secondary school who refuses or willfully neglects to make such reports as are required by law is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44030.5.

(a) The superintendent of a school district or county office of education, or the administrator of a charter school, employing a person with a credential shall report any change in the employment status of the credentialholder to the commission not later than 30 days after the change in employment status, if the credentialholder, while working in a position requiring a credential, and as a result of an allegation of misconduct or while an allegation of misconduct is pending, is dismissed, is nonreelected, resigns, is suspended or placed on unpaid administrative leave for more than 10 days as a final adverse action, retires, or is otherwise terminated by a decision not to employ or reemploy.

(b) For
 purposes of subdivision (a), a change of employment status due solely to unsatisfactory performance pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932 or a reduction in force pursuant to Sections 44955 to 44958, inclusive, is not a result of an allegation of misconduct.

(c) The failure to make the report required by subdivision (a) is unprofessional conduct and may subject the superintendent of the school district or county office of education, or the administrator of a charter school, to adverse action by the commission.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 44030, refusing or willfully neglecting to make the report required by subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) All fines
 imposed pursuant to this subdivision are the personal responsibility of the superintendent of the school district or county office of education, or the administrator of a charter school, and may not be paid or reimbursed with public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (AB 449)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

44031.

(a) Every employee has the right to inspect personnel records pursuant to Section 1198.5 of the Labor Code.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply to an employee of a school district:

(1) Information of a derogatory nature shall not be entered into an employee’s personnel records unless and until the employee is given notice and an opportunity to review and comment on that information. The employee shall have the right to enter, and have attached to any derogatory statement, his or her own comments. The review shall take place during normal business hours and the employee shall be released from duties for this purpose without salary reduction.

(2) The employee shall not have the right to inspect personnel records at a time when the employee is actually required to render services to the district.

(3) A noncredentialed employee shall have access to his or her numerical scores obtained as a result of a written examination.

(4) Except as provided in paragraph (3), nothing in this section shall entitle an employee to review ratings, reports, or records that (A) were obtained prior to the employment of the person involved, (B) were prepared by identifiable examination committee members, or (C) were obtained in connection with a promotional examination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 886, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44032.

The governing board of any school district shall provide for the payment of the actual and necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, of any employee of the district incurred in the course of performing services for the district, whether within or outside the district, under the direction of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

44033.

The governing board of any school district may provide for the reimbursement of employees of the district for the use of automobiles owned by the employees and used in the performance of regularly assigned duties, by establishing an allowance for such use on a mileage or monthly basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44034.

Any classroom teacher who, in the interest of improving his or her personal teaching techniques, wishes to use an audio recording device in a classroom to record classroom instructional presentations, may employ that device without the necessity of obtaining the approval of the school principal or other school officials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44035.

Every permanent employee of a school district which becomes in its entirety a part of a unified school district, and every permanent employee of a school district employed in a school located in a portion of a district which becomes a part of a unified school district, where the whole of the district does not become a part of a unified school district, shall become a permanent employee of the unified school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44036.

(a) The governing board of a school district may grant leaves of absence to employees to appear as a witness in court other than as a litigant or to respond to an official order from another governmental jurisdiction for reasons not brought about through the connivance or misconduct of the employee.

(b) The governing board of a school district may grant leaves of absence to employees, in positions requiring certification qualifications, regularly called for jury duty in the manner provided for by law.

(c) The governing board may grant such leaves of absence with pay up to the amount of the difference between the employee’s regular earnings and any amount he receives for jury or witness fees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44037.

The governing board of any district shall grant leave of absence to any employee, serving in a position not requiring certification qualifications, regularly called for jury duty in the manner provided for by law. The governing board shall grant such leave with pay up to the amount of the difference between the employee’s regular earnings and any amount he receives as juror’s fees.

It is unlawful for the governing board or personnel commission of any school district to adopt or maintain any rule, regulation, or policy which has as its purpose or effect a tendency to encourage employees to seek exemption from jury duty, or to directly or by indirection solicit or suggest to any employee that he seek exemption from jury duty, or to discriminate against any employee with respect to assignment, employment, promotion, or in any other manner because of such employee’s service on any jury panel.

The board or personnel commission may, however, provide by rule that only a percentage of its staff, which percentage shall not be less than 2 percent, shall be granted such leave, with pay, at any one time.

Nothing in the foregoing provisions shall preclude the district superintendent or his agent from discussing with the affected employee the practicality of seeking exemption when acceptance would tend to materially disrupt the district’s operations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44038.

The governing board of any school district may use school district funds for cash deposits, when required to guarantee payment for transportation purchased on credit for school district employees or other representatives who are directed by the governing board to travel on school district business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44039.

The governing board of any school district may use school district funds for cash deposits, when required to guarantee payment for health plans purchased on credit for school district employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44039.5.

No contract with any insurer or other employee welfare benefit provider shall be approved or renewed if an administrative employee of a school district, as defined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 33150, or any employee organization, as defined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, or any employee or agent thereof, has a direct financial interest in any plan or program which is being approved or renewed. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any employee welfare benefit fund jointly administered by one or more employers and one or more employee organizations or to any employee welfare benefit fund established by the school district for the purpose of self insuring.

As used in this section, “direct financial interest” means the receipt of or entitlement to a commission, fee, or other remuneration, including the payment of fees for administrative services rendered on behalf of such plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

44040.
